Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-302
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Alcohol and Drug Counseling Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-303 to 38-309 apply.

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 115;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,351;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 153.